Tennessee statutes. Title 57 Intoxicating Liquors
Part 2

Taxation

57-5-201. Barrel tax — Retailers to deal exclusively with Tennessee wholesalers and manufacturers. [Certain provisions subject to contingent repeal. See (a)(2).]

Every person, firm, corporation, joint-stock company, syndicate or association in this state storing, selling, distributing, or manufacturing such beer or other beverages as are described in this chapter shall pay a special privilege tax, in addition to all other taxes, in an amount equal to four dollars and twenty-nine cents ($4.29) per barrel of thirty-one liquid gallons (31 gals.) stored, sold, distributed by gift or sale or manufactured in this state; provided, that the rate shall be reduced by fifty cents (50¢) on July 1 of any year following the enactment of any state or federal law that imposes mandatory deposits by consumers on beverage containers sold in this state or on July 1, 2022, whichever occurs first. The tax upon barrels containing more or less than thirty-one gallons (31 gals.) shall be at a proportionate rate. Beer or other such beverage manufactured in Tennessee and thereafter exported for sale, distribution or gift, or dispensed gratuitously and consumed on the premises, shall not be included in the measure of the tax liability hereby provided for. The commissioner of revenue is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations for the purpose of securing the exemption hereby given and for the purpose of preventing such exemption from being claimed in the case of beer sold, distributed or given away in Tennessee. The burden shall be on the manufacturer claiming exemption to establish to the satisfaction of the collection officers that the beverage manufactured in Tennessee is exempt under this subsection (a).

Notwithstanding any provision of this section or law to the contrary, any revenue generated from the increase in tax rates from three dollars and forty cents ($3.40) to three dollars and ninety cents ($3.90) shall be allocated to the highway fund for the purpose of funding programs for the prevention and collection of litter and trash and matters related thereto. No later than March 31 of each year, the department of transportation shall transmit to the governor, and the speakers of the house of representatives and senate a report listing the programs receiving funds generated by this subsection (a), the amount of funds received by each program, and the purpose for which the funds were spent. This subdivision (a)(2) shall be repealed on July 1 of any year following the enactment of any state or federal law that imposes mandatory deposits by consumers on beverage containers sold in this state or on July 1, 2022, whichever occurs first.

The tax levied in subsection (a) shall be a state tax and no county, municipality or taxing district shall have power to levy any like tax. This tax shall not apply to beverages previously used as a measure of tax under the provisions hereof.

No retail dealer of beer, as defined in § 57-5-101(b), shall purchase beer from anyone other than a licensed wholesaler located in this state, and all such purchases shall be delivered by the wholesaler to the retailer's licensed premises only or directly to the retailer at the wholesaler's licensed premises. No wholesale distributor of beer shall purchase beer from anyone other than a licensed manufacturer, importer, or other wholesaler holding a permit issued pursuant to § 57-5-101, and all such purchases shall be delivered only at a warehouse facility owned or operated by the wholesaler and located within this state. Anyone importing or causing to be imported any beer, as defined in § 57-5-101(b), shall be liable as other wholesale distributors or dealers hereunder.

Anything to the contrary notwithstanding, a retail dealer of beer as defined in § 57-5-101(b) may purchase such beverages directly from a manufacturer located in Tennessee, licensed hereunder, if the sale of such beverages by the manufacturer directly to retailers is authorized by law pursuant to § 57-5-101.

Acts 1933, ch. 69, § 2; 1937, ch. 88, § 1; 1945, ch. 69, § 1; 1947, ch. 109, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 1191.2; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 14; Acts 1969, ch. 212, § 1; 1973, ch. 6, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-213; Acts 1981, ch. 307, §§ 1, 4; 1984, ch. 769, § 2; 1987, ch. 33, § 1; 1991, ch. 30, § 1; 1994, ch. 864, §§ 1, 2; 1995, ch. 2, § 1; 1999, ch. 81, §§ 1, 2; 2002, ch. 856, § 1b; 2005, ch. 86, § 1; 2010, ch. 616, § 1; 2014, ch. 861, §§ 9, 10; 2015, ch. 19, § 3; 2016, ch. 704, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1987, ch. 33, § 1 provided that the provisions of §§57-5-201 and67-4-402, containing the tax increases imposed by Acts 1981, ch. 307, and extended by Acts 1984, ch. 769, shall continue in effect until June 30, 1991, or until June 30 of any year following the enactment of any state or federal law which imposes mandatory deposits by consumers on beverage containers sold in Tennessee, notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary.

Acts 1991, ch. 30, § 1, effective June 1, 1991, provided that the provisions of this section and §67-4-402, containing the tax increases imposed by Acts 1981, ch. 307, and extended by Acts 1984, ch. 769 and Acts 1987, ch. 33, shall continue in effect until June 30, 1995, or until June 30 of any year following the enactment of any state or federal law which imposes mandatory deposits by consumers on beverage containers sold in Tennessee, notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary.

Acts 1991, ch. 30, § 2 provided that § 1 of that act applies to all returns for taxes filed on or after June 1, 1991.

Acts 1995, ch. 2, § 1, effective June 1, 1995, provided that the provisions of this section and §67-4-402, containing the tax increases imposed by Acts 1981, ch. 307, and extended by Acts 1984, ch. 769 and Acts 1987, ch. 33, and Acts 1991, ch. 30, shall continue in effect until June 30, 1999, or until June 30 of any year following the enactment of any state or federal law which imposes mandatory deposits by consumers on beverage containers sold in Tennessee, notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary.

Acts 1995, ch. 2, § 2 provided that § 1 of that act applies to all returns for taxes filed on or after June 1, 1995.

Acts 1999, ch. 81, § 1, effective June 1, 1999, provided that the provisions of this section and §57-5-201, containing the tax increases imposed by Acts 1981, ch. 307, and extended by Acts 1984, ch. 769, Acts 1987, ch. 33, Acts 1991, ch. 30, and Acts 1995, ch. 2 shall continue in effect until June 30, 2005, or until June 30 of any year following the enactment of any state or federal law which imposes mandatory deposits by consumers on beverage containers sold in Tennessee, notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary.

Acts 1999, ch. 81, § 3 provided that the amendment in that act, adding the last sentence of (a)(2), shall apply to all tax returns filed on or after June 1, 1999.

Acts 2002, ch. 856, § 10, effective July 4, 2002, provided that notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the commissioner of revenue is authorized to waive tax liability and associated interest and penalties otherwise imposed for failure to pay taxes levied pursuant to that act in a timely manner, but only to the extent that the taxpayer or vendor can demonstrate, to the commissioner's satisfaction, that the taxpayer's or vendor's noncompliance with the requirements of the act unavoidably and directly resulted from the close proximity of the effective date of the act with implementation of the increase in tax rates or items or activities taxed pursuant to the provisions of the act. Section 14(j) of the act provided that § 10 be repealed effective September 2, 2002.

Acts 2002, ch. 856, § 13 provided that no expenditure of public funds pursuant to that act shall be made in violation of the provisions of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as codified in 42 U.S.C. § 2000d.

Acts 2005, ch. 86, § 1, effective June 1, 2005, provided that the provisions of this section and §67-4-402, containing the tax increases imposed by Acts 1981, ch. 307, and extended by Acts 1984, ch. 769, Acts 1987, ch. 33, Acts 1991, ch. 30, Acts 1995, ch. 2, and Acts 1999, ch. 81 shall continue in effect until June 30, 2010, or until June 30 of any year following the enactment of any state or federal law which imposes mandatory deposits by consumers on beverage containers sold in Tennessee, notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, and shall apply to all tax returns filed on or after June 1, 2005.

Acts 2010, ch. 616, § 1, effective June 1, 2010, provided that the provisions of this section and 67-4-402, containing the tax increases imposed by Acts 1981, ch. 307, and extended by Acts 1984, ch. 769, Acts 1987, ch. 33, Acts 1991, ch. 30, Acts 1995, ch. 2, Acts 1999, ch. 81 and Acts 2005, ch. 86, shall continue in effect until June 30, 2016, or until June 30 of any year following the enactment of any state or federal law which imposes mandatory deposits by consumers on beverage containers sold in Tennessee, notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary; and Acts 2010, ch. 616, 2 provided that the act shall apply to all tax returns filed on or after June 1, 2010.

Acts 2016, ch. 704 § 2, which amended subdivision (a)(2), provided that subdivision (a)(2) shall be repealed on July 1 of any year following the enactment of any state or federal law that imposes mandatory deposits by consumers on beverage containers sold in this state or on July 1, 2022, whichever occurs first.

Acts 2016, ch. 704 § 5 provided that it is the legislative intent that the temporary taxes contained in §§57-5-201 and67-4-402, and first imposed by Acts 1981, ch. 307, are reenacted and extended in accordance with the act which amended this section.

Acts 2016, ch. 704 § 6 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to all tax returns filed on or after June 1, 2016.

Cross-References. Privilege tax on bottlers and manufacturers of soft drinks, §67-4-402.

Work on roads by prisoners, funding, §41-2-123.

Law Reviews.

An Examination of The Tennessee Law of Administrative Procedure (George Street Boone), 1 Vand. L. Rev. 339.

A Focus on Taxes: The Tennessee Tax Reform Act of 2002 Explained, 38 No. 9 Tenn. B.J. 12 (2002).

Building a House of Cards: A Policy Evaluation of Tennessee's Tax Reform Act of 2002 with Emphasis on Fairness to the Poor (Robert F. Parsley), 70 Tenn. L. Rev. 1177 (2003).

57-5-202. Commissioner of revenue — Supervision and collection of tax — Enforcement of law.

The supervision and collection of the tax imposed in § 57-5-201 is under the direction of the commissioner of revenue. The commissioner shall expend so much of four percent (4%) of the amount received thereunder each year as may be necessary to defray the expenses including clerical and mechanical help and transportation arising out of the administration of this chapter.

No employee of the commissioner shall, while so employed, be interested, directly or indirectly, in the vending, storing, distributing and/or manufacturing of such beer and/or any other beverage under the penalty of dismissal from office and of five hundred dollars ($500) fine, to be recovered by indictment or presentment.

The police and penal provisions of this chapter shall be enforced by members of the state highway patrol and all sheriffs, deputy sheriffs and police officers of the state and its political subdivisions. Such officers, along with inspectors, agents, representatives or officers appointed by the commissioner, shall be charged with the enforcement of the revenue provisions of this chapter. Duly authorized representatives of the department, in the discretion of the commissioner, are authorized and empowered to make arrests for violation of the revenue provisions of this chapter while on active duty engaged in enforcing the revenue provisions of this chapter.

Acts 1933, ch. 69, § 3; 1943, ch. 53, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 1191.3; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 14; Acts 1969, ch. 160, § 3; 1969, ch. 319, §§ 3, 4; 1970, ch. 456, § 1; 1970, ch. 496, § 1; 1970, ch. 578, § 1; 1970, ch. 588, §§ 1, 2; 1971, ch. 53, §§ 1-3; 1971, ch. 231, §§ 1, 2; 1972, ch. 584, § 1; 1973, ch. 389, § 1; 1974, ch. 631, §§ 1, 2; Private Acts 1976, ch. 242, § 1; Private Acts 1976, ch. 293; Acts 1977, ch. 239, § 4; T.C.A., (orig. ed.), § 57-214; Acts 1982, ch. 881, § 1; 1991, ch. 9, § 7; 1992, ch. 973, § 5; Private Acts 1994, ch. 191, § 4; Acts 1996, ch. 553, § 4; 1996, ch. 693, § 1; 1996, ch. 753, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1996, ch. 553, § 4 and Acts 1996, ch. 753, § 4 purported to amend the table of populations in (c)(2); however, (c)(2) was previously deleted by Acts 1996, ch. 693, § 1.

Cross-References. Constables, counties in which office abolished, §8-10-101.

57-5-203. Payment of tax money — Deadline.

The tax imposed in §57-5-201 shall be paid to the department of revenue on or before the twentieth day of the month following the month in which it accrues.

Acts 1933, ch. 69, § 4; 1941, ch. 52, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 1191.14; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 14; Acts 1972, ch. 448, § 2; 1979, ch. 202, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-215; Acts 1980, ch. 885, § 6; 1988, ch. 526, § 15.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1988, ch. 526, § 45 provided that the amendment by that act shall apply to all assessments of penalty made on or after January 1, 1989.

57-5-204. Default in payment of state privilege taxes — Cancellation of certificate.

If any such person shall at any time make default in the payment of the state privilege taxes levied under provisions hereof, the commissioner shall send by registered mail, with return receipt requested, written notice and demand for payment of such delinquent tax, showing the amount thereof due and unpaid, to the surety or sureties on the bond, at the address shown thereon or to the last known address, and if the delinquent tax and all interest and penalties legally due thereon shall not be paid within ten (10) days after the mailing of such notice, the commissioner shall cancel the certificate described under §57-5-102 and proceed against the delinquent under §§29-3-112 and29-3-113 and the commissioner is authorized and empowered, and it shall be the commissioner's duty, to issue a distress warrant for the collection of all delinquent state privilege taxes due under the provisions hereof, with interest and penalty in the sum of ten percent (10%).

Acts 1933, ch. 69, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 1191.7; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 14; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-216.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, §1-3-111.

57-5-205. Distribution of state privilege tax — Special census by municipality or county.

The state privilege tax collected under §§57-5-201 —57-5-204 shall be paid into the state treasury and shall be divided as follows:

From the proceeds of the amount so collected, ten and five hundredths percent (10.05%) shall be paid to the several counties equally to be used by them for general purposes, ten and five hundredths percent (10.05%) shall be divided between the existing incorporated municipalities according to population to be used by them for general purposes, and forty-one hundredths percent (0.41%) shall be reserved and transferred to the department of mental health and substance abuse services to assist municipalities and counties in carrying out the Comprehensive Alcohol and Drug Treatment Act of 1973, compiled as title 33, chapter 10; title 39, chapter 17, part 4; §§ 53-11-408 and 57-3-306; and this section. Any municipality or county shall have the right to take not more than four (4) special censuses at its own expense at any time during the interim between the regular decennial federal census. Such right shall include the current decennium. Any such census shall be taken by the federal bureau of the census, or in a manner directed by and satisfactory to the department of economic and community development. The population of the municipality or county shall be revised in accordance with the special census for purposes of distribution of such funds, effective on July 1, following the certification of the census results by the federal bureau of the census, or the department of economic and community development to the commissioner of finance and administration; the aggregate population shall likewise be adjusted in accordance with any such special census, effective July 1, following certification; and

The remainder of the tax collected under this section shall become a part of the general fund of the state.

Acts 1933, ch. 69, § 11; 1937, ch. 88, § 2; 1947, ch. 109, § 2; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 1191.15; Acts 1957, ch. 368, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; Acts 1973, ch. 295, § 19; 1974, ch. 516, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 1; Acts 1978, ch. 497, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-217; Acts 1981, ch. 307, § 2; 1996, ch. 675, § 66; 2000, ch. 947, § 6; 2003, ch. 355, § 20; 2005, ch. 500, § 3; 2006, ch. 989, § 8; 2009, ch. 186, § 39; 2010, ch. 1100, § 98; 2011, ch. 350, § 2; 2011, ch. 509, § 5; 2012, ch. 575, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 355, § 66 provided that no expenditure of public funds pursuant to the act shall be made in violation of the provisions of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as codified in 42 U.S.C. § 2000d.

Acts 2006, ch. 989, § 17 provided that the act shall apply to funds remitted to the department of revenue on or after August 1, 2006.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Cross-References. Special census by counties, §9-16-101.

State funding for litter abatement, §57-5-201.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, § 10.

Attorney General Opinions. The state can probably continue to distribute state-shared taxes even if the general assembly does not enact a general appropriations act, OAG 00-083 (5/4/00).

57-5-206. Records — Reports to commissioner of revenue — Rules and regulations.

Every person, firm, corporation, joint-stock company, syndicate or association in this state engaged in the storage, sale, distribution by sale or gift and/or manufacture in this state of such beer and/or other beverage shall keep invoices and all other memoranda fully descriptive thereof, and shall permit the commissioner or the commissioner's authorized agents, representatives or employees to inspect, at any time during the business hours of the day, all such articles, containers, packages, invoices, books, papers and memoranda as may be deemed necessary in the opinion of the commissioner, or the commissioner's authorized agent, representative or employee, in ascertaining whether or not the state privilege tax levied under §§ 57-5-201 — 57-5-203 has been paid or in determining the amount of such tax as may be due.

The original bill of sale or invoice or a digital copy thereof shall be kept by the wholesaler for at least two (2) years and the duplicate bill of sale or invoice shall be retained by the retailer for at least two (2) years, subject to inspection by the department or the county, municipal or metropolitan government involved.

The commissioner shall have the power to require any person engaged in the storage, sale, distribution by sale or gift, and/or manufacture, in this state, of such beer and/or any other such beverages, as described above, to furnish any reports, statements or information, under oath, which may be deemed, in the opinion of the commissioner, necessary for the purpose of enforcing a compliance herewith.

The commissioner is authorized and has the duty to make rules and regulations necessary, in the commissioner's opinion, to effectuate the purposes and carry out the provisions hereof, which rules and regulations shall have the force and effect of law if not in conflict with express statutory provision.

Acts 1933, ch. 69, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 1191.8; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 14; Acts 1971, ch. 21, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-218; Acts 1986, ch. 525, § 1; 2012, ch. 657, § 10.

Law Reviews.

An Examination of The Tennessee Law of Administrative Procedure (George Street Boone), 1 Vand. L. Rev. 339.

57-5-207. Failure to keep records or make reports — Refusal to permit examination of articles used to measure tax — Penalty.

The failure of any person, firm, corporation, joint-stock company, syndicate or association required to pay the state privilege taxes levied hereby, to preserve the invoices or memoranda required by § 57-5-206, or to permit the inspection and examination of such containers, packages, or articles used as the measure of the tax, and/or invoices, books, papers and memoranda at the request of the commissioner or the commissioner's authorized agent, representative or employee, or the failure of any such person to make or furnish any report which the commissioner is authorized to require when demanded by the commissioner, is a violation hereof.

Any person, firm, corporation, joint-stock company, syndicate or association violating this section is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1933, ch. 69, § 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 1191.9; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 14; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-219; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

57-5-208. Tax exemption for armed forces facilities.

The state tax on beer and ale shall not be applicable to beer and ale sold for consumption within the geographical boundaries of a fort, base, camp or post of the armed forces of the United States, post exchanges, ship service stores, commissaries and messes operated by the United States armed forces.

The exemption of the tax herein made shall be effectuated by the department of revenue allowing wholesalers and breweries, duly licensed in Tennessee, credit for taxes paid on beer or ale sold to post exchanges, ship service stores, commissaries and messes operated and controlled by the United States armed forces, and which are instrumentalities of the government of the United States.

Such credit shall be allowed only upon application made therefor to the department by the wholesaler or brewery delivering beer or ale and upon a showing, by copy of the invoice with the signature of the officer in charge of such post exchange, ship service store, commissary or mess certifying that the beer or ale was sold to and delivered to the post exchange, ship service store, commissary or mess by such Tennessee wholesaler or brewery. In addition, the application shall be supported by such other evidence as the commissioner may by regulation require.

Acts 1951, ch. 21, § 1 (Williams, § 1191.21); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 14; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-220.